Hawaii statutes.
§36-32 State educational facilities
improvement special fund. [Section repealed July 1, 2023. L 2013, c
157, §9(1).] (a) There is created in the treasury of the State the state
educational facilities improvement special fund. The special fund shall be
used solely to plan, design, acquire lands for, and to construct public school
facilities and to provide equipment and technology infrastructure to improve
public schools and other facilities under the jurisdiction of the department of
education, except public libraries. In addition, activities of the department
of education intended to eliminate the gap between the facility needs of
schools and available resources shall be eligible for funding from the special
fund. Expenditures from the special fund shall be limited to projects
authorized by the legislature for fiscal years ending prior to July 1, 2016,
and shall be subject to sections 37-31, and 37-33 through 37-40.
Appropriations or authorizations from the special fund shall be expended by the
superintendent of education.

(b) There is established within the state
educational facilities improvement special fund a separate account, to be known
as the lease payments for schools account, for lease payments required by
financing agreements entered into prior to July 1, 2013, by the department of
education pursuant to this section and sections 37D-2 and 302A-1506. The lease
payments for schools account shall be funded by legislative appropriations and
expended by the superintendent of education. Expenditures from the lease
payments for schools account shall be exempt from chapters 103 and 103D and are
restricted to lease payments on new schools included within the department of
education's current six year capital improvement programs and for which:

(1) The legislature adopted a concurrent resolution
directing the department of education to:

(A) Build a new school in
a specific geographic area using the design-build method; and

(B) Pursue the use of a financing agreement
to build the new school; or

(2) The legislature appropriated planning and design
funds and specified that the remainder of the costs necessary to complete the
project are eligible for funding through a financing agreement;

provided that any school to which the legislature
has appropriated planning and design funds prior to July 1, 2007, and for which
a private developer is willing to enter into a lease-purchase agreement with
the department of education within twelve months of July 1, 2007, is exempt
from the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(c) The department of education shall annually
post on the department's website information related to a financial statement
of the special fund, the lease payments for schools account established under
subsection (b), and the status of projects undertaken pursuant to this section,
no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. [L
1989, c 368, §2; am L 1993, c 364, §24; am L 1994, c 272, §32; am L 2005, c
189, §2; am L 2007, c 220, §2; am L 2013, c 157, §§1, 6; am L 2014, c 232, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next